Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-805
Designation of judge.

In counties having more than one judge of the district court, the judges at their annual meeting shall designate at least one judge of the county court or district court to hear cases under the Conciliation Court Law. Such assignment may be exclusive or in conjunction with any other assignment. The judge or judges so designated shall hold as many sessions of the conciliation court as are necessary for the prompt disposition of the business before the court.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 5, p. 655;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 24.